District of Columbia statutes.
48-931.02

Supervision by licensed practitioner.

A licensed practitioner, in good faith and in the course of professional practice only, may cause controlled substances to be administered by a nurse, certified emergency medical technician/paramedic, certified emergency medical technician/intermediate paramedic, or intern under the licensed practitioner’s direction and supervision.

Nov. 17, 1981, D.C. Law 4-52, § 3(c)(2), 28 DCR 4348
Oct. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-194, § 502, 49 DCR 5306
1981 Ed., § 33-567.
Effective October 17, 2003, D.C. Law 14-194 substituted “nurse, certified emergency medical technician/paramedic, certified emergency medical technician/intermediate paramedic, or intern” for “nurse or intern”.
Temporary Repeal of Section For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 2 of (D.C. Law 14-259, March 27, 2003, law notification 52 DCR 4125).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Uniform Controlled Substances Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-527, November 26, 2002, 49 DCR 11180).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Uniform Controlled Substances Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-15, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 1942).
Sections 502 and 503 of D.C. Law 14-194 amended this section applicable to Oct. 17, 2003.